Massachusetts, session 194th, H4670.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 2LLLLLL the following section:- 
Section 2MMMMMM. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the 
commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted fund known as the Personal Financial Literacy 
Education Fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner of elementary and secondary 
education. The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations or other money 
authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds 
from public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations; and (iii) interest earned on 
such revenues. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any 
money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund. 
(b)(1) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for 
purposes related to educating middle school and high school students on personal financial 
literacy, including, but not limited to: (i) procurement, development and distribution of personal 

 
of 5 14 financial literacy curricular materials, including educational resources and other necessary 
materials; (ii) professional development opportunities, including trainings, seminars, conferences 
and materials for educators to use in the teaching of personal financial literacy; and (iii) the grant 
program established in subsection (d). 
(2) In expending amounts credited to the fund, the commissioner may prioritize: (i) 
underserved communities across the commonwealth, including those public schools or school 
districts with high concentrations of economically-disadvantaged students; and (ii) schools 
implementing a personal financial literacy education program for the first time consistent with 
the standards set by the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to section 
102 of chapter 71. 
(c) Amounts received from private sources shall be approved by the commissioner of 
elementary and secondary education and subject to review before being deposited in the fund to 
ensure that pledged funds are not accompanied by conditions, explicit or implicit, on the 
implementation of personal financial literacy education programming that may be detrimental to 
the neutral and rigorous teaching of personal financial literacy or unduly influence the direction 
of personal financial literacy education policy. The review shall be made publicly available on 
the department of elementary and secondary education’s website. 
(d) There shall be a competitive grant program to promote the instruction of middle 
school and high school students on personal financial literacy developed and administered by the 
department of elementary and secondary education for all public schools and school districts. 
The department may expend funds from the fund for the grant program. The department may 

 
of 5 35 provide funds and other resources to public schools and school districts as needed to ensure that 
every public school and school district has the opportunity to apply for grants. 
(e) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner of elementary and secondary 
education shall report to the joint committee on education, the house and senate committees on 
ways and means and the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate on the fund’s 
activities. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the source and amount of funds 
received; (ii) the expenditures made from the fund and the purpose of such expenditures; (iii) any 
grants provided pursuant to subsection (d); (iv) anticipated revenue and expenditure projections 
for the next year; (v) the number of schools and school districts that have used funds to 
implement a new program or enhance or maintain current programming; and (vi) the number of 
schools and school districts that applied for, but were not granted, funding. The report shall be 
made publicly available on the department of elementary and secondary education’s website. 
SECTION 2. The fifteenth paragraph of section 1I of chapter 69 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (l) and (m) and 
inserting in place thereof the following 3 clauses:- 
(l) nutrition and wellness programs; 
(m) genocide education programs; and 
(n) personal financial literacy programs.  
SECTION 3. Said section 1I of said chapter 69, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after the sixteenth paragraph the following paragraph:- 

 
of 5 55  Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner shall provide a report on the 
progress of personal financial literacy programs in public schools and school districts to the joint 
committee on education and the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate. The report 
shall provide a description of the manner in which grantees of the competitive grant program 
pursuant to subsection (d) of section 2MMMMMM of chapter 29 offer personal financial literacy 
instruction, including: (i) the number of hours of instruction offered; (ii) the grade levels at 
which such instruction is offered; and (iii) the title and description of the course in which such 
instruction is integrated.  
SECTION 4. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 102. (a) Every school district shall, for the purpose of educating middle school 
and high school students, provide instruction on personal financial literacy consistent with 
standards established by the department.  
(b) Instruction on personal financial literacy shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) 
earning and spending income, local, state and federal taxes, charitable giving, methods of 
payment, consumer protection, balancing ledgers and checkbooks and budgeting; (ii) long-term 
savings, the role of banks and financial institutions, simple and compound interest, financial 
regulation and planning for the future; (iii) using credit and making investments, risks of various 
financial instruments and basic diversification of assets; (iv) protecting and insuring assets, 
preventing identity theft and avoiding online scams; (v) emerging technologies in the financial 
industry, a basic understanding of cryptocurrencies, online commerce and computer stock-
trading, how to evaluate digital media content relating to personal finance matters and how to 

 
of 5 77 recognize risk; and (vi) rights and responsibilities of renting or buying a home or making other 
large purchases or investments. 
(c)(1) The department shall assist schools in providing: (i) instruction on personal 
financial literacy by facilitating access to high-quality curricular materials; and (ii) professional 
development opportunities, including trainings, seminars, conferences and materials for 
educators to use in the teaching of personal financial literacy. 
(2) The department may provide trainings, seminars, conferences and materials for 
educators to use in the teaching of personal financial literacy in person or through the use of 
synchronous or asynchronous audio, video, electronic media or other telecommunications 
technology. 
(d) Nothing in this section shall require a school district to require personal financial 
literacy instruction in every year of middle school and high school; provided, however, that 
personal financial literacy education and instruction shall be utilized during appropriate times in 
middle school and high school curricula, as determined by the school district.  
SECTION 5. Section 4 shall take effect beginning in the 2026-2027 school year.